North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 24. Conduct of Municipal Elections.
§ 163-302.
Absentee voting.

In any municipal election, including a primary or general election or referendum, absentee voting may, upon resolution of the municipal governing body, be permitted. Such resolution must be adopted no later than 60 days prior to an election in order to
be effective for that election. Any such resolution shall remain effective for all future elections unless repealed no later than 60 days before an election. A copy of all resolutions adopted under this section shall be filed with
the State Board of Elections and the county board of elections conducting the election within 10 days of passage in order to be effective. In addition, absentee voting shall be allowed in any referendum on incorporation of a municipality.

(Effective until March 9, 2022) The provisions of Articles 20 and 21 of this Chapter shall apply to absentee voting in municipal elections, special district elections, and other elections for an area less than an entire county other than elections for
the General Assembly, except that the earliest date by which absentee ballots shall be required to be available for absentee voting in such elections shall be 30 days prior to the primary or election or as quickly following the
filing deadline specified in G.S. 163-291(2) or G.S. 163-294(c) as the county board of elections is able to secure the official ballots. In elections on incorporation of a municipality not held at the same time as another election
in the same area, the county board of elections shall adopt a special schedule of meetings of the county board of elections to approve absentee ballot applications so as to reduce the cost of the process, and to further implement
the last paragraph of G.S. 163-230(2)a. If no application has been received since the last meeting, no meeting shall be held of the county board of elections under such schedule unless the meeting is scheduled for another purpose.
If another election is being held in the same area on the same day, or elsewhere in the county, the cost of per diem for meetings of the county board of elections to approve absentee ballots shall not be considered a cost of the
election to be billed to the municipality being created.

(b)

(Effective March 9, 2022 until June 1, 2022)
The provisions of Articles 20 and 21 of this Chapter shall apply to absentee voting in municipal elections, special district elections, and other elections for an area less than an entire county other than elections
for the General Assembly, except that the earliest date by which absentee ballots shall be required to be available for absentee voting in such elections shall be 30 days prior to the primary or election or as quickly following
the filing deadline as the county board of elections is able to secure the official ballots. In elections on incorporation of a municipality not held at the same time as another election in the same area, the county board of
elections shall adopt a special schedule of meetings of the county board of elections to approve absentee ballot applications so as to reduce the cost of the process, and to further implement the last paragraph of G.S. 163-230(2)a.
If no application has been received since the last meeting, no meeting shall be held of the county board of elections under such schedule unless the meeting is scheduled for another purpose. If another election is being held
in the same area on the same day, or elsewhere in the county, the cost of per diem for meetings of the county board of elections to approve absentee ballots shall not be considered a cost of the election to be billed to the
municipality being created.

(b)

(Effective June 1, 2022)
The provisions of Articles 20 and 21 of this Chapter shall apply to absentee voting in municipal elections, special district elections, and other elections for an area less than an entire county other than elections
for the General Assembly, except that the earliest date by which absentee ballots shall be required to be available for absentee voting in such elections shall be 30 days prior to the primary or election or as quickly following
the filing deadline specified in G.S. 163-291(2) or G.S. 163-294(c) as the county board of elections is able to secure the official ballots. In elections on incorporation of a municipality not held at the same time as another
election in the same area, the county board of elections shall adopt a special schedule of meetings of the county board of elections to approve absentee ballot applications so as to reduce the cost of the process, and to further
implement the last paragraph of G.S. 163-230(2)a. If no application has been received since the last meeting, no meeting shall be held of the county board of elections under such schedule unless the meeting is scheduled for
another purpose. If another election is being held in the same area on the same day, or elsewhere in the county, the cost of per diem for meetings of the county board of elections to approve absentee ballots shall not be considered
a cost of the election to be billed to the municipality being created.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1975, c. 370, s. 1; c. 836; 1977, c. 475, s. 1; 1983, c. 324, s. 6; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 933, s. 1; 2014-111, s. 10; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2021-56, s. 1.5(c).

Subsection (b) Set Out Three Times.

The first version of subsection (b) set out above is effective until March 9, 2022. The second version of subsection (b) set out above is effective March 9, 2022 until June 1, 2022. The third version of subsection (b) set out above is effective June 1,
2022.

Local Modification.

City of Cherryville: 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 935; town of Hazelwood: 1987, c. 338, s. 8; town of Mooresville: 1987, c. 359; town of Old Fort: 1993, c. 35, s. 1 (effective July 1, 1993 with respect to all elections held on or after July 1, 1993); town
of Waynesville: 1987, c. 338, s. 8; Alamance County Board of Elections: 1998-151, s. 9.6; First Craven Sanitary District: 2014-54, s. 1 (as to subsection (a)); Union County Board of Elections: 1998-151, s. 9.6.

§ 163-303.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 265, s. 19.

§ 163-304.
State Board of Elections to have jurisdiction over municipal elections, and to advise; emergency and ongoing administration by county board.

Authority and Duty of State Board. —

The State Board of Elections shall have the same authority over municipal elections as it has over county and State elections. The State Board of Elections shall advise and assist cities, towns, incorporated villages and special districts, their members
and legal officers on the conduct and administration of their elections and registration procedure.

The county boards of elections shall be governed by the same rules for settling controversies with respect to counting ballots or certification of the returns of the vote in any municipal or special district election as are in effect for settling such
controversies in county and State elections.

History.
1971, c. 835, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 92; 1999-426, s. 6(a); 2001-319, s. 11; 2001-374, s. 3; 2011-31, s. 25; 2012-194, s. 22(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-305.
Validation of elections.

All elections, and the results thereof, previously held in and for any municipality, special district, or school administrative unit pursuant to Subchapter IX, Chapter 163, are hereby validated.

History.
1973, c. 492, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-306.
Assumption of office by mayors and councilmen.

Newly elected mayors and councilmen (members of the governing body) shall take office as prescribed by

G.S. 160A-68

.

History.
1973, c. 866; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 163-307 through 163-320.

Reserved for future codification purposes.